Oklahoma, session 2026, SB906.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 59 O.S. 2021, Section 353.18A, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 353.18A. A. Supportive personnel may perform certain
tasks in the practice of pharmacy if such personnel perform the
tasks in compliance with rules promulgated by the State Board of
Pharmacy.
B. 1. No person shall serve as a pharmacy technician without
first procuring a permit from the Board.
2. An application for an initial or renewal pharmacy technician
permit issued pursuant to the provisions of this subsection shall be
submitted to the Board and provide any other information deemed
relevant by the Board.
3. An application for an initial or renewal permit shall be
accompanied by a permit fee not to exceed Seventy Five Seventy-five
Dollars ($75.00) for each period of one (1) year. A permit issued

pursuant to this subsection shall be valid for a period to be
determined by the Board.
4. Every permitted pharmacy technician who fails to complete a
renewal form and remit the required renewal fee to the Board by the
fifteenth day after the expiration of the permit shall pay a late
fee to be fixed by the Board.
5. A pharmacy technician permit shall be cancelled canceled
thirty (30) days after expiration.
6. A person may obtain reinstatement of a cancelled canceled
pharmacy technician permit by making application, paying a
reinstatement fee, and satisfactorily completing other requirements
set by the Board.
C. A licensed retail pharmacy shall maintain a pharmacy
technician-to-pharmacist ratio of not more than four pharmacy
technicians for every one licensed pharmacist.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.
ENR. S. B. NO. 906 Page 2

Passed the Senate the 24th day of March, 2025.
Presiding Officer of the Senate
Passed the House of Representatives the 7th day of May, 2025.
Presiding Officer of the House
of Representatives
OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR
Received by the Office of the Governor this ____________________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
Approved by the Governor of the State of Oklahoma this _________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
_________________________________
Governor of the State of Oklahoma
OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE
Received by the Office of the Secretary of State this __________
day of __________________, 20 _______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
ENR. S. B. NO. 906 Page 3